Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.031

Capital appropriation bill—Estimated general fund debt service costs.

A capital appropriation bill shall include the estimated general fund debt service costs associated with new capital appropriations contained in that bill for the biennia in which the appropriations occur and for the succeeding two biennia.

[ 1991 c 284 s 2.]